Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1404.01
Assistant funeral director, defined.

Assistant funeral director means a person who assists a funeral director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 4.